Massachusetts, session 194th, H3402.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with Massachusetts Bay Community
College, may convey to Kimberlee A. Dow, or her successors or assigns, of 23 Oakland circle in
the town of Wellesley a certain parcel of land, which is a portion of the land described in a deed
recorded with the Norfolk registry of deeds in book 4990, page 254, located in the town of
Wellesley which is currently under the care and control of Massachusetts Bay Community
College, and is currently used for community college purposes. The parcel contains 3,500 square
feet more or less and is identified more or less as “Gravel Driveway” on a draft plan on file with
of 3

the division of capital asset management and maintenance entitled, “Plan of Land 23 Oakland
Circle Wellesley, Norfolk County, Massachusetts”, dated May 7, 2024, prepared by Anderson
Surveys, Inc.; provided, however, that the boundaries of the parcel shall be determined by the
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance. The conveyance shall be without
representations or warranties and shall be subject to any additional terms and conditions as the
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may deem necessary.
SECTION 2. An independent appraisal of the fair market value and value in use of the
parcel described in section 1 shall be prepared in accordance with the usual and customary
professional appraisal practices by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the commissioner of
capital asset management and maintenance. The commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance shall submit the appraisal or appraisals to the inspector general for their review and
comment. The inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal, and the review shall
include an examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector general shall
prepare a report of their review and file the report with the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance for submission by said commissioner to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory
oversight. Said commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisals, and the inspector general’s
review and approval and comments, if any, to the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight at least 15 days
prior to the execution of documents effecting the transfers described in section 1.
SECTION 3. Consideration for the conveyance shall be the full and fair market value or
the value in proposed use, whichever is greater, of the parcel as determined by the commissioner
of capital asset management and maintenance pursuant to 1 or more independent professional
of 3

appraisals. The proceeds realized from the disposition authorized in section 1 shall be deposited
in the Massachusetts Bay Community College Oakland Circle Scholarship trust.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Kimberlee A.
Dow or her successors or assigns shall be responsible for all costs and expenses of any
transaction authorized by this act as determined by the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance, including, but not limited to, the costs of any engineering,
surveys, appraisals, title examinations, recording fees and deed preparation.
SECTION 5. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth an
expendable trust account known as Massachusetts Bay Community College Oakland Circle
Scholarship trust which shall be administered by the president of Massachusetts Bay Community
College. The trust shall be credited with: (i) the proceeds realized from the disposition authorized
in section 1; (ii) any appropriation, grant, gift or other contribution made to the fund; and (iii)
any interest earned on money in the fund.
Amounts credited to the trust shall be expended, without further appropriation, for
student scholarships. The unexpended balance in the trust at the end of a fiscal year shall remain
available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the trust shall
cause the fund to be in deficit at any point.
of 3